Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5833.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 19. (1) An applicant must submit with its application, on forms provided by the board, a photograph and 2 sets of fingerprints for each individual that is subject to licensure. (1) (2) An applicant and licensee A person applying for or holding a sports betting supplier license or occupational license issued by the board shall consent to inspections, criminal history background record checks, searches and seizures, and the providing of handwriting exemplars, fingerprints, photographs, and information as authorized in this act and in rules promulgated by the board. (3) The board may collect fingerprints from, and conduct criminal history investigations on, a board employee or prospective board employee. (2) (4) The board may conduct a criminal history investigations on applicants, licensees, record check on an individual applying for or holding a sports betting supplier license or occupational license issued by the board. The board may also conduct a criminal history record check on a board employees, employee or prospective board employees, and other persons including board agents and contractors working for the board for the purpose of carrying employee to carry out its the board's statutory powers and responsibilities under this act and rules promulgated under this act. (3) (5) For the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and responsibilities, the board shall require the persons an individual identified in subsection (4) (6) or (7) to submit, his or her with the individual's application on forms provided by the board, the individual's fingerprints for review by the department of state police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the criminal history record check, in the form and manner required by the department of state police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain any information currently or subsequently contained in the files of the department of state police or the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The department of state police shall provide all criminal history record checks requested by the board under this act and rules promulgated under this act. The department of state police may charge the board a fee for a criminal history record check required under this section. The board shall not share the criminal history record check with a private entity. (4) (6) The department of state police shall store and retain all fingerprints submitted under this act in an automated fingerprint identification system that provides for an automatic notification if new criminal arrest information matches fingerprints previously submitted under this act. Upon On the notification described in this subsection, the department of state police shall immediately notify the board. The fingerprints retained under this act may be searched against future fingerprint submissions, and any relevant results will must be shared with the board. (5) (7) If the department of state police is able to participate in the Federal Bureau of Investigation's automatic notification system, all fingerprints submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation may be stored and retained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in its automatic notification system. The automatic notification system provides for automatic notification if new criminal arrest information matches fingerprints previously submitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation under this act. If the department of state police receives a notification from the Federal Bureau of Investigation under this act, the department of state police shall immediately notify the board. (6) For the purposes of this section, an individual applying for or holding an occupational license includes any of the following: (a) An individual who directly supervises sports traders. (b) An individual who is a sports trader or acting as a sports trader. (c) An individual who supervises an individual who has access to any critical components of an internet sports betting platform. (d) An individual employed as the head of any of the following departments within a sports betting operation: (i) Fraud and risk. (ii) Sports trading. (iii) Infrastructure technology. (iv) Accounting and finance. (v) The department responsible for remitting daily payment to this state. (7) For purposes of this section, an individual applying for or holding a sports betting supplier license includes any of the following: (a) A director of a sports betting supplier applicant or sports betting supplier licensee who is not occupationally licensed. (b) A managerial employee of a sports betting supplier applicant or sports betting supplier licensee who is not occupationally licensed and performs the function of principal executive officer, principal operations officer, or principal accounting officer. (c) A director or a managerial employee of a qualifying business of a sports betting supplier applicant or sports betting supplier licensee who performs the function of principal executive officer, principal operations officer, or principal financial officer. As used in this subdivision, "qualifying business" means any of the following: (i) A person that is not an individual and directly or indirectly controls the applicant. (ii) A person that is not an individual and directly or indirectly holds more than a 5% direct or indirect ownership interest in the applicant. (iii) A person that is not an individual, that has ownership common to the ownership of the applicant, and that provides a material aspect of the goods or services the applicant provides, or plans to provide, in this state.